siciliano-clitics-unfinished.lexc
LEXICON SufVerbIri2
	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*iri #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ir SufClit;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*eva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*evu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*evi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*ivi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*eva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*iva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*evamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*ivamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*evavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*ivavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*evanu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ivanu #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ii #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*iu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*isti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ìu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emmu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*erunu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*eru #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*iamo #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*iate #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*ano #;
	
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*issimu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*issivu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issiru #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issinu #;
	
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*issiru #;
	
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*isci #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*issiru #;

!--- unfinished italian forms ---
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+SING:+PART+PRES+SING*ente #;
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+PLUR:+PART+PRES+PLUR*enti #;
!---                          ---
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:+PART+PAST+MASC+SING*utu #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING*uta #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR*uti #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR*uti #;
	
	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
! 	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu SufClit;

LEXICON SufClit
	+C_NE:+C_NE*ne #;
	+C_SI:+C_SI*si #;
	+C_TI:+C_TI*ti #;
	+C_VI:+C_VI*vi #;
	+C_CE+C_LA:+C_CE+C_LA*cela #;
	+C_CE+C_LE:+C_CE+C_LE*cele #;
	+C_CE+C_LI:+C_CE+C_LI*celi #;
	+C_CE+C_LO:+C_CE+C_LO*celo #;
	+C_CE+C_NE:+C_CE+C_NE*cene #;
	+C_GLI+C_LO:+C_GLI+C_LO*glielo #;
	+C_GLI+C_LA:+C_GLI+C_LA*gliela #;
	+C_GLI+C_LE:+C_GLI+C_LE*gliele #;
	+C_GLI+C_LI:+C_GLI+C_LI*glieli #;
	+C_GLI+C_NE:+C_GLI+C_NE*gliene #;
	+C_ME+C_LA:+C_ME+C_LA*mela #;
	+C_ME+C_LE:+C_ME+C_LE*mele #;
	+C_ME+C_LI:+C_ME+C_LI*meli #;
	+C_ME+C_LO:+C_ME+C_LO*melu #;
	+C_ME+C_NE:+C_ME+C_NE*mene #;
	+C_SE+C_LA:+C_SE+C_LA*sela #;
	+C_SE+C_LE:+C_SE+C_LE*sele #;
	+C_SE+C_LI:+C_SE+C_LI*seli #;
	+C_SE+C_LO:+C_SE+C_LO*selo #;
	+C_SE+C_NE:+C_SE+C_NE*sene #;
	+C_TE+C_LA:+C_TE+C_LA*tela #;
	+C_TE+C_LE:+C_TE+C_LE*tele #;
	+C_TE+C_LI:+C_TE+C_LI*teli #;
	+C_TE+C_LO:+C_TE+C_LO*telo #;
	+C_TE+C_NE:+C_TE+C_NE*tene #;
	+C_VE+C_NE:+C_VE+C_NE*vene #;
	+C_VE+C_LA:+C_VE+C_LA*vela #;
	+C_VE+C_LE:+C_VE+C_LE*vele #;
	+C_VE+C_LI:+C_VE+C_LI*veli #;
	+C_VE+C_LO:+C_VE+C_LO*velo #;
	+C_MI+C_CI:+C_MI+C_CI*mici #;
	+C_TI+C_CI:+C_TI+C_CI*tici #;
	+C_VI+C_CI:+C_VI+C_CI*vici #;
	+C_VI+C_SI:+C_VI+C_SI*visi #;
	+C_CI+C_SI:+C_CI+C_SI*cisi #;
	+C_LO+C_SI:+C_LO+C_SI*losi #;
	+C_LA+C_SI:+C_LA+C_SI*lasi #;
	+C_LE+C_SI:+C_LE+C_SI*lesi #;
	+C_LI+C_SI:+C_LI+C_SI*lisi #;
	+C_GLI+C_SI:+C_GLI+C_SI*glisi #;
	+C_TE+C_LO+C_SI:+C_TE+C_LO+C_SI*telosi #;
	+C_VE+C_LO+C_SI:+C_VE+C_LO+C_SI*velosi #;
	+C_GLI+C_LO+C_SI:+C_GLI+C_LO+C_SI*glielosi #;
	+C_CE+C_LO+C_SI:+C_CE+C_LO+C_SI*celosi #;
	+C_ME+C_LO+C_SI:+C_ME+C_LO+C_SI*melosi #;

END

LEXICON Root 
	l_aviri+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:avir SufClit;
	l_essiri+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:essir SufClit;
	l_pàrtiri:part+V_IRI SufVerbIri2 ;
	l_durmiri:durm+V_IRI SufVerbIri2 ;
	l_finiri:fin+V_IRI SufVerbIri2 ;
